Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1037
School funds; distribution; basis.

(1) Each county treasurer shall add (a) all money received by the county treasurer of his or her county on account of fines and licenses, (b) the proceeds from the sale of schoolhouses, sites, or other property of a school district, and (c) all unexpended balances of proceeds of taxes levied by a district when the district has been taken by the United States for any defense, flood control, irrigation, or war project.

(2) The sum total referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed to the several districts of the county pro rata according to the enumeration of those children who are five through eighteen years of age for which the district is obligated to report on the census last returned by the districts.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 4, p. 369;

R.S.1913, § 6931;

Laws 1915, c. 122, § 2, p. 281;

Laws 1917, c. 127, § 1, p. 308;

C.S.1922, § 6514;

C.S.1929, § 79-2003;

Laws 1943, c. 197, § 3, p. 664;

R.S.1943, § 79-2003;

Laws 1949, c. 265, § 1, p. 879;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 379, p. 818;

Laws 1951, c. 276, § 12, p. 933;

Laws 1953, c. 291, § 8, p. 992;

Laws 1961, c. 409, § 1, p. 1227;

Laws 1963, c. 493, § 2, p. 1576;

Laws 1971, LB 1002, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 487, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 633, § 11;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 62;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 67;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1304;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 683;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 97.

This section provides the basis for distribution of school fund. School Dist. No. 54 of Douglas County v. School Dist. of Omaha, 171 Neb. 769, 107 N.W.2d 744 (1961).